District of Columbia statutes.
42-1013

Trust powers imperative — Duty upon grantee.

Every trust power, unless its execution or non-execution is made expressly to depend on the will of the grantee, is imperative and imposes a duty on the grantee the performance of which may be compelled in equity for the benefit of the parties interested.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1354, ch. 854, § 1049

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-113.
1973 Ed., § 45-1013.